Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-111
City or village plat; change; when authorized.

The county board shall have power to change the name of any city or village plat on the petition of a majority of the local voters residing therein, when the inhabitants thereof have not become a body corporate.

Laws 1879, § 23, p. 360;

Laws 1887, c. 26, § 1, p. 351;

Laws 1905, c. 44, § 1, p. 288;

R.S.1913, § 952;

Laws 1915, c. 17, § 1, p. 74;

C.S.1922, § 852;

Laws 1925, c. 93, § 1, p. 273;

Laws 1929, c. 60, § 2, p. 232;

C.S.1929, § 26-105;

Laws 1931, c. 40, § 1, p. 135;

Laws 1933, c. 36, § 1, p. 237;

Laws 1939, c. 28, § 5, p. 145;

Laws 1941, c. 48, § 2, p. 236;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-105;

Laws 1943, c. 57, § 1(7), p. 225;

R.S.1943, § 23-111.